Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5143.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 14. Fees for an individual licensed or seeking licensure under article 20A of the occupational code, MCL 339.2015 to 339.2025, are as follows: (a) Application processing fees, $175.00. (b) License fee, per year, $125.00. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5144 (request no. H01671'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.